Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1005
Basic workweek; persons excepted.

Subsection (2) of section 84-1001 shall not apply to (1) employees of the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, the Nebraska Brand Committee, or the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, (2) the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, his or her deputies and assistants, members of the Nebraska State Patrol, or carrier enforcement officers designated under section 60-1303, or (3) the employees of the Division of Motor Fuels of the office of the Tax Commissioner who render service on such days and maintain such hours as the Governor may designate, except that when employees are required to work on any day designated as a paid holiday, subsections (4) and (5) of section 84-1001 shall apply.

Laws 1957, c. 398, § 5, p. 1365;

Laws 1965, c. 572, § 1, p. 1860;

Laws 1967, c. 617, § 2, p. 2070;

Laws 1969, c. 840, § 1, p. 3166;

Laws 1969, c. 839, § 2, p. 3165;

Laws 1985, LB 395, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 17.